Nebraska, session 109, LB1006.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Protecting Consumers and Jobs from Predatory Pricing Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) It is the policy of Nebraska to protect consumers from predatory
pricing schemes in whatever iteration they appear or evolve;
(2) Advancements in algorithms, in artificial intelligence, and in
electronic shelving technology have created commercial and retail
environments where it is possible to set pricing for a product or service
based on personal or protected data;
(3) Current law does not sufficiently prohibit companies from using
personal or protected data to set prices;
(4) The use of personal or protected data to set prices presents a
distinct potential for companies to violate consumer privacy rights and
may result in discrimination;
(5) While offering goods at different prices due to customer demand
is not new, there are subtle and important differences between price
optimization and dynamic and surveillance pricing;
(6) It is in the interest of the state and its consumers to regulate
technologies or business models which can impact consumers or competition
by monetizing consumers' personal information;
(7) Business models in dynamic and surveillance pricing have results
that will lead to the elimination of numerous jobs, the existence of
which are relied upon by the communities of the state for the livelihood
of their residents and by the state directly for economic growth;
(8) Protection of these jobs will further protect consumers who are
part of this economic ecosystem and will add to the growth of the economy
and job market of Nebraska; and
(9) By enacting laws regulating dynamic, surveillance, and
personalized algorithmic pricing, Nebraska can protect and promote the
growth of jobs in the future.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Protecting Consumers and Jobs from
-2-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
Predatory Pricing Act:
(1) Algorithm means a computational process that uses a set of rules
to define a sequence of operations, including, but not limited to,
artificial intelligence systems and facial-recognition software;
(2) Business means any person, firm, organization, partnership,
association, corporation, or any other entity doing business in Nebraska;
(3) Clear and conspicuous disclosure means disclosure in the same
medium as and provided on, at, or near and contemporaneous with every
advertisement, display, image, offer, or announcement of a price for
which notice is required using lettering and wording that is easily
visible and understandable to the average consumer;
(4) Consumer means an individual who is seeking or solicited to
purchase, lease, or receive a good or service not for resale in the
ordinary course of the individual's trade or business but for personal,
family, or household use;
(5) Consumer data means any data that identifies or could reasonably
be linked, directly or indirectly, with a specific individual or device,
excluding location data;
(6) Dynamic pricing means pricing that fluctuates dependent on
conditions that algorithmic or artificial intelligence models retrain or
recalibrate on information in near real-time, excluding promotional
pricing offers, loyalty program benefits, or other temporary discounts or
changes to pricing related to retention of existing customers;
(7) Electronic shelving label means electronic and wireless paper
displays that present product and pricing information;
(8) Grocery store means an establishment that is primarily engaged
in retailing a general line of food, such as canned or frozen foods,
fresh fruits or vegetables, or fresh or prepared meats, fish, or poultry;
(9)(a) Nondigital presentation of price means:
(i) A sign which offers the unit price for one or more brands or
sizes of a given commodity;
-3-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
(ii) A sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag, affixed to the shelf
upon which the commodity is displayed; and
(iii) A sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag, affixed to the
commodity itself.
(b) If a single sticker, stamp, sign, label, or tag does not provide
the unit price information for more than one brand or size of a given
commodity, then the following information shall be provided:
(i) The identity of the commodity;
(ii) The brand name of the commodity;
(iii) The quantity of the packaged commodity if more than one
package size per brand is displayed;
(iv) The total sale price of the commodity; and
(v) The price per appropriate unit.
(c) Where a sign providing unit price information for one or more
sizes or brands of a given commodity is used, the sign shall be centrally
located as close as practical to all items to which the sign refers, and
the unit price information displayed thereon shall be presented in a
clear, distinct, and nondeceptive manner;
(10) Personalized algorithmic pricing means dynamic pricing or
surveillance pricing derived from or set by an algorithm that uses
consumer data which may vary among consumers and groups of consumers;
(11) Protected class data means information about an individual or
group of individuals that directly, in combination, or by implication
identifies a characteristic that is legally protected from discrimination
under state or federal law, including, but not limited to, ethnicity,
national origin, age, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity and expression, pregnancy outcomes, and reproductive health
care; and
(12) Surveillance pricing means offering or setting a customized
price for a good or service for a specific consumer or group of
consumers, based, in whole or in part, on information collected through
-4-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
electronic surveillance technology. Surveillance pricing includes the use
of technological methods, systems, or tools, including, but not limited
to, sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric monitoring, or other
forms of observation or data collection that are capable of gathering
information about the behavior, characteristics, location, or other
personal attributes of a consumer, whether in physical or digital
environments.
Sec. 4. (1) Any business that knowingly advertises, promotes,
labels, or publishes a statement, display, image, offer, or announcement
that uses personalized algorithmic pricing using consumer data specific
to a particular consumer is required to provide a clear and conspicuous
disclosure to consumers that the price was set by an algorithm using the
personal data of the consumer.
(2) A grocery store larger than ten thousand square feet shall not
use electronic shelving labels or any digital shelf display technology,
and shall use a nondigital presentation of price. This prohibition does
not limit the ability of any grocery store or business to provide a
consumer a discount, promotional price, or loyalty program benefit based
on the consumer's previous purchase history.
(3) No business shall use electronic shelving labels or any digital
shelf display technology to display personalized algorithmic pricing or
surveillance pricing.
(4) No business shall use personalized algorithmic pricing or
surveillance pricing for any reason.
(5) No business shall collect or use the data of an individual
younger than seventeen years of age for targeted advertising or
personalized algorithmic pricing under any circumstances.
(6) No business shall use protected class data in setting a price
for, offering, marketing, or selling any good or service if any of the
following are true:
(a) The use of such data has the effect of withholding or denying
-5-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
any of the accommodations, advantages, or privileges accorded to other
individuals or groups; or
(b) The price for such good or service is different from the price
offered to other individuals or groups based, in whole or in part, on the
use of protected class data.
Sec. 5. The Protecting Consumers and Jobs from Predatory Pricing
Act shall not apply to any:
(1) Person providing financial services, including, but not limited
to, financial institutions, financial institution affiliates, broker-
dealers, registered investment advisors, and persons that provide
consumer credit products such as credit cards, personal loans, and
mortgages; or
(2) Insurer licensed, regulated, or otherwise authorized to do
business in Nebraska, including any person, agent, or affiliate acting on
behalf of such insurer.
Sec. 6. (1) Whenever a potential violation of the Protecting
Consumers and Jobs from Predatory Pricing Act occurs, the Attorney
General may bring an action in the name of the State of Nebraska in a
court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin and restrain such violation and
its continuance.
(2) In connection with any such action, the Attorney General is
authorized to take evidence, make a determination of the relevant facts,
and to issue subpoenas.
(3) If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the
defendant has, in fact, violated the Protecting Consumers and Jobs from
Predatory Pricing Act, the court may issue an injunction, enjoining and
restraining such violation and its continuance without requiring proof
that any person has, in fact, been injured or damaged by the violation.
(4) Whenever a court determines that a violation of the Protecting
Consumers and Jobs from Predatory Pricing Act has occurred, the court may
impose a civil penalty of not more than seven thousand five hundred
-6-

LB1006 LB1006
2026 2026
dollars for each violation.
(5) In addition to any other remedies provided in the Protecting
Consumers and Jobs from Predatory Pricing Act, any person aggrieved by a
violation of the act may bring a civil action against the violator.
(6) Nothing in this section shall in any way limit rights or
remedies which are otherwise available under law to the Attorney General
or any other person authorized to bring an action under this section.
Sec. 7. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-7-